Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 27 O.S. 2021, Section 5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5. Any county, city, town, township, school district,


or board of education, or any board or official having charge of


cemeteries created and existing under the laws of this state, shall


have power to condemn lands in like manner as railroad companies,


for highways, rights-of-way, building sites, cemeteries, public


parks, and other public purposes uses.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 27 O.S. 2021, Section 17, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 3496 Page 1


Section 17. A. In the event that a portion of the total amount


of real property taken by eminent domain under the procedures set


forth in Title 27 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title for a public


purpose use as described in Section 9 of Title 27 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title is not used for the purposes use for which it


was condemned or for another public use by the agency or other


entity which acquired the real property, the portion of the real


property that is not used shall be declared surplus and shall be


first offered for resale to the person from whom the property was


taken or the heirs of the person at the appraised value or the


original price at which the acquiring agency or entity purchased


that portion of the property, whichever is less.


B. For purposes of complying with subsection A of this section,


the agency or entity which acquired the real property by


condemnation shall notify the former landowner of the right of first


refusal by sending notice by certified mail, return receipt


requested, to the last-known address of the person as provided by


the person. If the mail is returned as not subject to delivery or


the former landowner is deceased, notice of the right of first


refusal shall be provided by publication in a newspaper of general


circulation in the community where the real property is located.


The notice shall contain the name of the former landowner and a


legal description of the surplus property. If the offer to


repurchase is not accepted within ninety (90) days from the date of

Req. No. 3496 Page 2


notice or if the offer to repurchase is not accepted from the date


the resale price on the property is determined, the property may


then be sold at public sale.


C. This section shall not apply to conveyances for


redevelopment under Sections 38-101 through 38-123 of Title 11 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 41 of Title 27, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, and subject to subsection B of this


section, “public use” means:


1. The enjoyment, possession, occupation, or ownership of land


by the general public or by a government entity for use as a public


highway, road, easement, right-of-way, public building, public


cemetery, public park, or for any other use expressly authorized in


Section 5 of Title 27 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


2. The possession, occupation, or ownership of land for the


operations of a public utility or a private entity that is expressly


authorized by statute to exercise eminent domain and that serves the


general public.


B. The state shall not take or damage private property unless


the taking is necessary for a public use as defined in subsection A


of this section and just compensation is paid to the property owner.


Economic development including, but not limited to, increased tax

Req. No. 3496 Page 3


revenues, increased tax base, employment, or general economic health


shall not constitute a public use. No taking shall be justified or


authorized on the grounds that the taking may result in increased


economic development, secondary, or incidental economic benefits.


C. A governmental body subordinate to the state may not create,


exercise, expand, or extend any power of eminent domain without


express statutory authority. No ordinance, charter, resolution,


policy, or local action may broaden the definition of public use


beyond the uses defined in subsection A of this section.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3496 BLB 1/12/2026 9:03:01 AM

























Req. No. 3496 Page 4